Utah statutes.
30-1-8.   Application for license -- Contents.

(1)  A marriage license may be issued by the county clerk to a man and a woman only after an application has been filed in his office, requiring the following information:

(a)  the full names of the man and the woman, including the maiden name of the woman;

(b)  the Social Security numbers of the parties, unless the party has not been assigned a number;

(c)  the current address of each party;

(d)  the date and place of birth (town or city, county, state or country, if possible);

(e)  the names of their respective parents, including the maiden name of the mother;

(f)  the birthplaces of fathers and mothers (town or city, county, state or country, if possible); and

(g)  the distinctive race or nationality of each of the parents.

(2)  If the woman is a widow, her maiden name shall be shown in brackets.

(3)  If one or both of the parties is under 16 years of age, the clerk shall provide them with a standard petition on a form approved by the Judicial Council to be presented to the juvenile court to obtain the authorization required by Section 30-1-9.

(4) (a)  The Social Security numbers obtained under the authority of this section may not be recorded on the marriage license, and are not open to inspection as a part of the vital statistics files.

(b)  The Department of Health, Bureau of Vital Records and Health Statistics  shall, upon request, supply those Social Security numbers to the Office of Recovery Services within the Department of Human Services.

(c)  The Office of Recovery Services may not use any Social Security numbers obtained under the authority of this section for any reason other than the administration of child support services.

